Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AID TO AMBULANCE SERVICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the definitions in Minnesota Statutes, section 144E.001, apply and the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "EMS responses" means the number of responses reported to the director by a licensee via the Minnesota state ambulance reporting system during the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin (c) "Response density" means the quotient of a licensee's EMS responses divided by the square mileage of the licensee's primary service area. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Excluded services. new text end new text begin The director shall exclude EMS responses by specialized life support as described under Minnesota Statutes, section 144E.101, subdivision 9, when calculating EMS responses, response density, or aid payments under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Multiple licenses. new text end new text begin When a licensee, a licensee's parent company, a subsidiary of the licensee, or a subsidiary of the licensee's parent company collectively hold one or more licenses, the director must treat all such related licensees as a single licensee and the sum of the square mileages of the primary service areas as a single primary service area for the purposes of calculating EMS responses, response density, and aid payments under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligible licensees; application process. new text end new text begin (a) Only licensees with a response density of 30 responses per square mile or fewer are eligible for aid payments under this section. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible licensee may apply to the director, in the form and manner determined by the director, for aid payments under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Director calculations. new text end new text begin (a) Prior to determining an aid payment amount for eligible applicants, the director must make the calculations in paragraphs (b) to (d). new text end new text begin (b) For each eligible applicant, the director shall determine the amount equal to dividing 20 percent of the amount appropriated for aid payments under this section equally among all eligible applicants. new text end new text begin (c) For each eligible applicant, the director shall determine the amount equal to dividing 40 percent of the amount appropriated for aid payments under this section by each eligible applicant's share of the total square mileage of all eligible applicants' primary service areas. For the purposes of both calculating the total square mileage of the primary service areas of all eligible applicants and for calculating each eligible applicant's share of the total, the square mileage of each eligible applicant's primary service area is capped at 1,200 square miles. new text end new text begin (d) For each eligible applicant, the director shall determine the amount equal to dividing 40 percent of the amount appropriated for aid payments under this section by each eligible applicant's share of the total EMS response points awarded according to clauses (1) to (4): new text end new text begin (1) for EMS response 1 to EMS response 500, a licensee is awarded ten points for each EMS response; new text end new text begin (2) for EMS response 501 to EMS response 1,500, a licensee is awarded five points for each EMS response; new text end new text begin (3) for EMS response 1,501 to EMS response 2,500, a licensee is awarded zero points for each EMS response; and new text end new text begin (4) for EMS response 2,501 and each subsequent EMS response, a licensee's points are reduced by two points for each EMS response, except a licensee's total awarded points must not be reduced below zero. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Aid amount. new text end new text begin The director must make an aid payment to an eligible applicant in the amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated in subdivision 5, paragraphs (b) to (d). new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin A recipient of an aid payment under this section must spend the money only on expenses incurred in the provision of licensed ambulance services within the recipient's primary service area or areas. A recipient of an aid payment under this section must spend the entire amount within two calendar years after receiving the aid. Any unspent aid must be returned to the director. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Payment date. new text end new text begin The director must certify the aid payment amount for each eligible applicant and must make the full aid payment by December 31 of each calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) By December 31 of each year following the receipt of an aid payment under this section, a recipient of an aid payment must submit to the director a report summarizing how the recipient used the revenue from the aid payment made in the preceding year. new text end new text begin (b) By March 31 of each year following the reporting required under paragraph (a), the director must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the Office of Emergency Medical Services a report summarizing the information provided by aid recipients under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Office of Emergency Medical Services for aid payments to eligible applicants under this section. new text end